Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-609
Invention developer; bond; filings required; fees.

(1) Every invention developer rendering or offering to render invention development services in this state shall maintain a bond issued by a surety company holding a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, the principal sum of which shall not be less than twenty-five thousand dollars in the first or any subsequent year of operation. The invention developer shall file a copy of the bond with the Secretary of State prior to the time the invention developer first commences business in this state or within ninety days after September 6, 1991, whichever is later, and shall pay an initial filing fee of one hundred dollars. The invention developer shall file an annual statement that the bond is current and shall pay a filing fee of twenty-five dollars on or before July 1 of each year after the initial filing.

(2) The bond shall be in favor of the State of Nebraska for the benefit of any person who, after entering into a contract for invention development services with an invention developer, is injured by fraud, dishonesty, or failure to provide the services of the invention developer in performance of the contract. Any person claiming against the bond may maintain an action at law against the invention developer and the surety. The aggregate liability of the surety to all persons for all breaches of conditions of the bond shall not exceed the amount of the bond.

Laws 1991, LB 96, § 9.